Utah statutes.
76-5-409.   Corroboration of admission by child's statement.

(1)  Notwithstanding any provision of law requiring corroboration of admissions or confessions, and notwithstanding any prohibition of hearsay evidence, a child's statement indicating in any manner the occurrence of the sexual offense involving the child is sufficient corroboration of the admission or the confession regardless of whether or not the child is available to testify regarding the offense.

(2)  A child, for purposes of Subsection (1), is a person under the age of 14.

